California, session 20252026, AB1923.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)Hospitals are essential health care infrastructure. Every year, California’s hospitals save countless lives, restore patients’ health, and provide livelihoods for hundreds of thousands of workers.(b)Timely access to hospital care is critical to saving lives and preventing avoidable harm. Hospital closures or significant reductions in services increase travel times, delay diagnosis and treatment, and heighten risks for patients experiencing time-sensitive medical conditions, including heart attack, stroke, sepsis, respiratory distress, and obstetric emergencies.(c)Hospitals across the state are in severe financial distress. Nearly half of California hospitals are operating in the red. Now, as a result of the looming impacts of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law No. 119-21), many more hospitals face a precarious financial outlook.(d)Hospitals experiencing financial distress disproportionately provide care to underserved communities, including Medi-Cal beneficiaries, uninsured patients, and patients with complex medical and social needs. They play a vital role as safety net providers and are central to advancing health equity in California.(e)Hospital closures and service reductions have significant ripple effects on communities, including job losses, reduced local economic activity, increased emergency medical transport times, and the loss of clinical training sites that are necessary to sustain the health care workforce.(f)The state has a compelling interest in preserving access to hospital services where closures or service reductions would threaten the adequacy of health care access for a community, particularly for underserved and high-need populations.(g)The Distressed Hospital Loan Program administered by the Department of Health Care Access and Information has proven remarkably successful in addressing short-term liquidity challenges, covering extraordinary or unanticipated costs that otherwise jeopardized the continued operation of an otherwise viable hospital. To date, the program has helped 15 hospitals keep their doors open, and 1 hospital to reopen entirely.(h)Notwithstanding the success of the program, there is an acute and growing need for a second round of loans. These needs are driven by the volatile economic and policy environment causing rising prices and falling reimbursement. Loans provided through the Distressed Hospital Loan Program will provide sustainability while promoting accountability. They will support hospitals as they implement corrective action plans, pursue operational and financial restructuring, engage in affiliations or transactions, address facility or infrastructure needs, and stabilize services necessary to maintain patient access to care.(i)Providing loans through the Distressed Hospital Loan Program is essential to prevent avoidable hospital closures, reduces downstream costs to the state associated with delayed or higher cost care, and supports the efficient use of public resources.(j)It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to reinvigorate and strengthen the Distressed Hospital Loan Program administered by the Department of Health Care Access and Information in order to preserve essential hospital services, protect access to care for Californians, and promote the long-term stability of the state’s hospital delivery system.SEC. 2.Section 129380 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:129380.(a)This program shall be known, and may be cited, as the Distressed Hospital Loan Program.(b)The purpose of this program is to provide interest-free cashflow loans to not-for-profit hospitals and public hospitals in significant financial distress or to governmental entities representing a closed hospital, except as otherwise provided, to prevent the closure of, or facilitate the reopening of, those hospitals.(c)This section shall become inoperative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this subdivision, and repealed as of January 1, of the next year.SEC. 3.Section 129380 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:129380.(a)This program shall be known, and may be cited, as the Distressed Hospital Loan Program.(b)The purpose of this program is to provide interest-free cashflow loans to not-for-profit hospitals and public hospitals in significant financial distress or to governmental entities representing a closed hospital, except as otherwise provided, to prevent the closure of, or facilitate the reopening of, those hospitals.(c)The purpose of the program also includes providing interest-free cashflow loans or other relief as authorized by this chapter to any hospital, regardless of ownership type or system affiliation, if the hospital, and its associated entities, if applicable, meet the applicable criteria for significant financial distress as established by the department and the authority.(d)This section shall become operative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this section.SEC. 4.Section 129381 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:129381.For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a)“Authority” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority.(b)“Closed hospital” means a hospital that closed after January 1, 2022.(c)“Department” means the Department of Health Care Access and Information.(d)“Not-for-profit hospital” means the same as a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15432 of the Government Code that is organized as a not-for-profit entity.(e)“Program” means the Distressed Hospital Loan Program.(f)“Public hospital” means a hospital that is licensed to a county, a city, a city and county, the University of California, a local health care district, a local health authority, or a municipal hospital established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 37600) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code.(g)This section shall become inoperative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this subdivision, and repealed as of January 1, of the next year.SEC. 5.Section 129381 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:129381.For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a)“Associated entities” means any affiliates, subsidiaries, or other entities that control, govern, or are financially responsible for the hospital or are subject to the control, governance, or financial control of the hospital, foreign or domestic.(b)“Authority” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority.(c)“Closed hospital” means a hospital that closed after January 1, 2022.(d)“Department” means the Department of Health Care Access and Information.(e)“Not-for-profit hospital” means the same as a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15432 of the Government Code that is organized as a not-for-profit entity.(f)“Program” means the Distressed Hospital Loan Program.(g)“Public hospital” means a hospital that is licensed to a county, a city, a city and county, the University of California, a local health care district, a local health authority, or a municipal hospital established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 37600) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code.(h)This section shall become operative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this section.SEC. 6.Section 129383 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:129383.(a)In collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the State Department of Public Health, the department shall develop a methodology to evaluate an at-risk hospital’s potential eligibility for state assistance from the program.(1)(A)The methodology shall consider factors, including, but not limited to, whether the hospital is in financial distress, as solely determined by the department, whether the hospital is small, rural, a critical access hospital, a trauma center, an urban hospital providing access for an underserved area, a hospital that serves a disproportionate share of Medicaid patients, or serving a rural catchment area, whether closure of the hospital would significantly impact access to services in the region, and whether the hospital is publicly owned.(B)The methodology for determining financial distress may consider such factors as the hospital’s prior and projected performance on financial metrics, including the amount of cash on hand, and whether the hospital has, or is projected to experience, negative operating margins.(2)The methodology shall also be used for identification and monitoring of hospitals at risk of financial distress.(b)A hospital or a closed hospital applying for aid under this program shall provide the authority and the department with financial information, in a format determined by the authority and the department, demonstrating the hospital’s need for financial assistance due to financial hardship.(c)(1)Before receiving state assistance under this program, an eligible hospital shall submit a plan to the authority, which it shall share with the department, with projections detailing the uses of the proposed loan and strategies proposed by the hospital’s governing body to regain financial viability and continue to operate.(2)Before issuing a loan under this chapter, the department shall review the plan submitted by an eligible hospital and make a determination that the plan is viable and there is a reasonable likelihood that the hospital will be able to regain financial viability and continue to operate as a hospital. The department shall not issue a loan award if the department is unable to make this determination.(d)The department shall issue the loan award to a qualifying hospital as soon as reasonably practicable following its eligibility determination.(e)Not-for-profit hospitals and public hospitals that belong to integrated health care systems with more than two separately licensed hospital facilities shall be ineligible for state assistance under the program.(f)The department shall, in consultation with the authority, determine the application process, underwriting review, and methodology for approval and distribution of the loans under the program.(g)The department shall have the authority to determine service provision requirements in approving, and for the duration of, loans to eligible hospitals. In making its determination, the department shall consider the impact of any changes to the hospital’s service delivery on access to necessary medical care, particularly for beneficiaries of the Medi-Cal program.(h)The department shall make the methodology publicly accessible on its internet website.(i)This section shall become inoperative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this subdivision, and repealed as of January 1, of the next year.SEC. 7.Section 129383 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:129383.(a)In collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the State Department of Public Health, the department shall develop a methodology to evaluate an at-risk hospital’s potential eligibility for state assistance from the program.(1)(A)The methodology shall consider factors, including, but not limited to, whether the hospital is in financial distress, as solely determined by the department, whether the hospital is small, rural, a critical access hospital, a trauma center, an urban hospital providing access for an underserved area, a hospital that serves a disproportionate share of Medicaid patients, or serving a rural catchment area, whether closure of the hospital would significantly impact access to services in the region, and whether the hospital is publicly owned.(B)The methodology for determining financial distress may consider such factors as the hospital’s prior and projected performance on financial metrics, including the amount of cash on hand, credit rating, debt capacity, capital investment, reserves, investments, commercial prices, and whether the hospital has, or is projected to experience, negative operating margins. Projections shall account for impacts of federal and state policy changes affecting hospital reimbursement or health care coverage, including, but not limited to, the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law No. 119-21).(C)(i)The applicable criteria for a hospital shall include the fiscal condition of the hospital, including revenues, reserves, profits, credit rating, debt capacity, capital investment, commercial prices, and assets of the hospital and associated entities. To assess the fiscal condition of the hospital, the authority and department shall review financial reports from the hospital and consolidated financial statements from associated entities, if applicable.(ii)A hospital with associated entities shall only be eligible for state assistance from the program if the hospital’s associated entities are determined not to have capacity to provide sufficient financial resources to resolve the financial distress of the hospital.(2)The methodology shall also be used for identification and monitoring of hospitals at risk of financial distress.(b)A hospital or a closed hospital applying for aid under this program shall provide the authority and the department with financial information, in a format determined by the authority and the department, demonstrating the hospital’s need for financial assistance due to financial hardship.(c)(1)Hospitals with associated entities shall submit financial statements and consolidated financial statements with information on all associated entities for the authority and the department to determine the hospital’s need for financial assistance. The required financial information shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A)A statement of financial position, including reserves and investments.(B)Audited annual financial statements for the last three years.(C)If the hospital or any associated entity is a for-profit entity, financial disclosure to the authority and the department shall include payouts to investors, shareholders, and management companies, even if privately held.(2)The amount paid out to investors, shareholders, and management companies in the last three years shall be deducted from any loan amount from the program, if issued.(d)(1)Before receiving state assistance under this program, an eligible hospital shall submit a plan to the authority, which it shall share with the department, with projections detailing the uses of the proposed loan and strategies proposed by the hospital’s governing body to regain financial viability and continue to operate.(2)Before issuing a loan under this chapter, the department shall review the plan submitted by an eligible hospital and make a determination that the plan is viable and there is a reasonable likelihood that the hospital will be able to regain financial viability and continue to operate as a hospital. The department shall not issue a loan award if the department is unable to make this determination.(3)The department shall consider requiring conditions on the loans to maintain timely access to services in the affected community. Conditions may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A)Maintaining labor and delivery services, emergency services, and other services that the hospital currently provides.(B)Continued participation in Medi-Cal, Medi-Cal managed care, and county contracts.(C)Required or maintaining community benefit and charity care.(e)The department shall issue the loan award to a qualifying hospital as soon as reasonably practicable following its eligibility determination.(f)(1)For awards provided under this chapter before the effective date of the act that added paragraph (2), not-for-profit hospitals and public hospitals that belong to integrated health care systems with more than two separately licensed hospital facilities shall be ineligible for state assistance under the program.(2)For awards provided under this chapter after the effective date of the act that added this paragraph, any hospital, regardless of ownership type or system affiliation, shall be eligible for state assistance under the program if the hospital meets the applicable criteria for significant financial distress as established by the department and the authority, and, if the hospital has associated entities, the requirements for eligibility to receive the loan pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(g)The department shall, in consultation with the authority, determine the application process, underwriting review, and methodology for approval and distribution of the loans under the program.(h)The department shall have the authority to determine service provision requirements in approving, and for the duration of, loans to eligible hospitals. In making its determination, the department shall consider the impact of any changes to the hospital’s service delivery on access to necessary medical care, particularly for beneficiaries of the Medi-Cal program.(i)The department shall make the methodology publicly accessible on its internet website.(j)This section shall become operative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this section.SEC. 8.SECTION 1. Section 129384 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:129384. (a) Notwithstanding Section 15432 of the Government Code, unless subdivision (c) applies, a hospital shall be required to begin making monthly repayments of the loan after the first 18 months and shall discharge the loan within 72 months of the date of the loan.(b) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permissible under federal rules, security for the cashflow loans in this chapter shall be Medi-Cal reimbursements due to the hospital from the State Department of Health Care Services. The department’s or authority’s recoupment of these cashflow loans shall not exceed 20 percent of the hospital’s respective Medi-Cal checkwrite payments until the loan amount has been satisfied. In the event that a 20-percent withhold will not result in full repayment of the loan within a 72-month period, the department may extend the repayment term of the loan.(c) (1) The department, in consultation with the authority, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, shall develop an application and approval process for loan forgiveness or modification of the terms of the loan, including a delay of the beginning of the loan repayment period or an extension of the 72-month loan repayment term, or both. The process shall include, but is not limited to, eligibility criteria for an applicant for loan forgiveness or modification, including which portion of a loan may be forgiven or modified.(2) The department shall provide loan forgiveness or modification of loan terms to an applicant based upon criteria determined by the department and subject to the approval of the department and the authority. The Department of Finance shall be authorized to approve any loan forgiveness and any modification of loan terms that would result in the extension of the payback period by more than one year.(3) The department shall also establish the terms and conditions associated with accepting loan forgiveness or modification of loan terms, subject to approval of the Department of Finance.(4) Before any action on a request for forgiveness or modification of any loan that would result in the extension of the payback period by more than one year, and again not later than 60 days after final approval or denial of the forgiveness or modification, the department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature notice of the request and the subsequent action, including a summary of the request and reason for the denial, approval, or modification.(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this subdivision, and repealed as of January 1, of the next year.SEC. 9.SEC. 2. Section 129384 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:129384. (a) Notwithstanding Section 15432 of the Government Code, unless subdivision (c) applies, a hospital shall be required to begin making monthly repayments of the loan after the first 18 months and shall discharge the loan within 72 months of the date of the loan.(b) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permissible under federal rules, security for the cashflow loans in this chapter shall be Medi-Cal reimbursements due to the hospital from the State Department of Health Care Services. The department’s or authority’s recoupment of these cashflow loans shall not exceed 20 percent of the hospital’s respective Medi-Cal checkwrite payments until the loan amount has been satisfied. In the event that a 20-percent withhold will not result in full repayment of the loan within a 72-month period, the department may extend the repayment term of the loan.(c) (1) The department, in consultation with the authority, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, shall develop an application and approval process for loan forgiveness or modification of the terms of the loan, including a delay of the beginning of the loan repayment period or an extension of the 72-month loan repayment term, or both. The process shall include, but is not limited to, eligibility criteria for an applicant for loan forgiveness or modification, including which portion of a loan may be forgiven or modified. The criteria shall incorporate projections of future financial performance in addition to a hospital’s point-in-time financial condition.(2) The department shall provide loan forgiveness or modification of loan terms to an applicant based upon criteria determined by the department and subject to the approval of the department and the authority. No later than two months after the effective date of the act that added subparagraphs (A) and (B), the department shall provide loan forgiveness to any participant of the program who received a loan under this chapter before the effective date of the act that added subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the department and authority determine the participant meets both of the following:(A) The participant has demonstrated a good faith effort to comply with program requirements through January 1, 2026.(B) Financial projections demonstrate that the participant will become financially distressed as a result of loan repayments under the program or other outside factors, including, but not limited to, the impacts of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law No. 119-21).(3) Before any action on a request for forgiveness or modification of any loan that would result in the extension of the payback period by more than one year, and again not later than 60 days after final approval or denial of the forgiveness or modification, the department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature notice of the request and the subsequent action, including a summary of the request and reason for the denial, approval, or modification.(d) This section shall become operative on July 1 of the year an appropriation is made for the purpose of implementing the changes made by the bill that adds this section.SEC. 10.SEC. 3. Section 129387 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:129387. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 11.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to prevent further hospital closures and reductions to health care access in vulnerable communities, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.